Ohio, session 136, SB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4511.451 of the Revised Code be 4
amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4511.451. (A) As used in this section, "funeral 6
procession" means two or more vehicles accompanying the cremated 7
remains or the body of a deceased person in the daytime when 8
each of the vehicles has its headlights lighted and is 9
displaying a purple and white or an orange and white pennant 10
attached to each vehicle in such a manner as to be clearly 11
visible to traffic approaching from any direction. 12
(B) Excepting public safety vehicles proceeding in 13
accordance with section 4511.45 of the Revised Code or when 14
directed otherwise by a police officer, pedestrians and the 15
operators of all vehicles, street cars, and trackless trolleys 16
shall yield the right of way to each vehicle that is a part of a 17
funeral procession. Whenever the lead vehicle in a funeral 18
procession lawfully enters an intersection, the remainder of the 19

S. B. No. 97 Page 2
As Introduced
vehicles in the procession may continue to follow the lead 20
vehicle through the intersection notwithstanding any traffic 21
control devices or right of way provisions of the Revised Code, 22
provided that the operator of each vehicle exercises due care to 23
avoid colliding with any other vehicle or pedestrian. 24
(C) No person shall operate any vehicle as a part of a 25
funeral procession without having the headlights of the vehicle 26
lighted and without displaying a purple and white or an orange 27
and white pennant in such a manner as to be clearly visible to 28
traffic approaching from any direction. 29
(D)(D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, 30
whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. 31
If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has 32
been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor 33
vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is 34
guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one 35
year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted 36
of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, 37
whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the 38
third degree. 39
(2) Notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, 40
upon finding that a person operated a motor vehicle in violation 41
of division (B) of this section, the court, in addition to all 42
other penalties provided by law, shall impose a fine of two 43
times the usual amount imposed for the violation. 44
(3) If the offender commits the offense while distracted 45
and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the 46
commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the 47
additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the 48
Revised Code. 49

S. B. No. 97 Page 3
As Introduced
Section 2. That existing section 4511.451 of the Revised 50
Code is hereby repealed. 51